Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1177SV (3) 91 jm/md S.F. 596 Section 1. Section 29C.17, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. For purposes consistent with this chapter , the local 3 emergency management agencyâs approved budget shall be fully 4 funded by one or any combination of the following options, as 5 determined by the commission: 6 a. A countywide special levy pursuant to section 331.424, 7 subsection 1 . 8 b. Per a per capita allocation funded from the city and 9 county general funds or by a combination of city and county 10 special levies which may be apportioned among the member 11 jurisdictions fund and from the rural county services levy . 12 c. An allocation computed as each jurisdictionâs relative 13 share of the total assessed valuation within the county. 14 d. A voluntary share allocation. 15 e. Other funding sources allowed by law. 16 Sec. 2. Section 29C.17, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 6. Subject to chapter 24 , the commission shall adopt, 19 certify, and provide a budget, on or before February 28 1 20 of each year, to the funding entities determined pursuant to 21 subsection 2 . The form of the budget shall be as prescribed by 22 the department of management. Any portion of a tax levied by a 23 county or city to support the local emergency management agency 24 shall be identified separately on tax statements issued by the 25 county treasurer. 26 Sec. 3. Section 331.423, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If the county funded an emergency 29 management program under chapter 29C using funds from a county 30 general services levy under this subsection for the fiscal year 31 beginning July 1, 2025, the amount levied under such levy for 32 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, shall not exceed the 33 amount levied for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. 34 Sec. 4. Section 331.424, subsection 1, paragraph a, 35 -1- LSB 1177SV (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 S.F. 596 subparagraph (9), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 1 subparagraph and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 (9) The maintenance and operation of a joint 911 service 3 board. 4 Sec. 5. Section 331.424, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If the county funded an emergency 7 management program under chapter 29C using funds from a county 8 general services supplemental levy under this subsection for 9 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the amount levied under 10 such levy for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, shall not 11 exceed the amount levied for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 12 2025. 13 Sec. 6. Section 331.427, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 14 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 15 Sec. 7. Section 331.428, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 16 by adding the following new paragraph: 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Local emergency management agency under 18 chapter 29C. 19